Utah statutes.
11-30-5.   Publication of order for hearing.

(1)  Prior to the date set for hearing, the clerk of the court shall cause the order to be published:

(a)  once each week for three consecutive weeks:

(i)  in a newspaper published or of general circulation within the boundaries of the public body; or

(ii)  if the public body has no defined boundaries or there is no newspaper published or of general circulation within the defined boundaries, a newspaper reasonably calculated to notify all parties, which has been approved by the court; and

(b)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for three weeks.

(2)  If a refunding bond is being validated, all holders of the bonds to be refunded may be made defendants to the action, in which case notice may be made, and if so made shall be considered sufficient, by mailing a copy of the order to each holder's last-known address.

(3)  By publication of the order, all defendants shall have been duly served and shall be parties to the proceedings.

